zh-CN: 足球桌尺寸类别: 全尺寸; 中等尺寸; 迷你/桌面款; 其他
sl-SI: Kategorija velikosti mize: Polna velikost; Srednja velikost; Mini/namizno; Drugo
th: หมวดหมู่ขนาดโต๊ะ: ขนาดเต็ม; ขนาดกลาง; ขนาดเล็ก/ตั้งโต๊ะ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Categoria de tamanho da mesa: Tamanho completo; Tamanho médio; Mini/de mesa; Outro
nb: Størrelseskategori for bord: Full størrelse; Mellomstor; Mini/bordmodell; Annet
hr-HR: Kategorija veličine stola: Puna veličina; Srednja veličina; Mini / za stol; Ostalo
it: Categoria di dimensione del tavolo: Misura intera; Media; Mini/da tavolo; Altro
en: Table size category: Full-size; Mid-size; Mini/tabletop; Other
sv: Bordsstorlekskategori: Fullstorlek; Mellanstorlek; Mini/bord; Annat
ro-RO: Material al bazei mesei: Mărime completă; Mărime medie; Mini/de masă; Altele
ja: テーブルサイズカテゴリー: フルサイズ; ミッドサイズ; ミニ/卓上; その他
nl: Categorie tafelgrootte: Volledig formaat; Middelgroot; Mini/tafelmodel; Overig
fi: Pöydän koon kategoria: Täysikokoinen; Keskikokoinen; Mini / pöytämalli; Muu
pt-BR: Categoria de tamanho da mesa: Tamanho normal; Tamanho médio; Mini/de mesa; Outro
ko: 테이블 크기 범주: 풀 사이즈; 미드 사이즈; 미니/테이블탑; 기타
el: Κατηγορία μεγέθους τραπεζιού: Πλήρες μέγεθος; Μεσαίο μέγεθος; Μίνι/επιτραπέζιο; Άλλο
zh-TW: 桌面尺寸分類: 全尺寸; 中尺寸; 迷你/桌上型; 其他
ru: Категория размера стола: Полноразмерный; Средний размер; Мини/настольный; Другое
de: Größenkategorie des Tisches: Standardgröße; Mittelgroß; Mini/Tischgröße; Sonstige
sk-SK: Kategória veľkosti stola: V plnej veľkosti; Stredná veľkosť; Mini/stolná; Iná
vi: Nhóm kích thước bàn: Cỡ chuẩn; Cỡ trung; Cỡ nhỏ/để bàn; Khác
da: Størrelseskategori for bord: Fuld størrelse; Mellemstørrelse; Mini/bordmodel; Andet
es: Categoría de tamaño de la mesa: Tamaño completo; Tamaño mediano; Mini/de mesa; Otro
lt-LT: Stalo dydžio kategorija: Pilno dydžio; Vidutinio dydžio; Mini / stalo; Kita
cs: Kategorie velikosti stolu: Plná velikost; Střední velikost; Mini/stolní; Jiné
hu: Asztalméret kategóriája: Teljes méretű; Közepes méretű; Mini / asztali; Egyéb
fr: Catégorie de taille de table: Taille réelle; Taille moyenne; Miniature/de table; Autre
pl: Kategoria wielkości stołu: Pełnowymiarowe; Średniej wielkości; Mini / stołowe; Inne
bg-BG: Категория размер на масата: Пълен размер; Среден размер; Мини/за маса; Друго
tr: Masa boyut kategorisi: Tam boy; Orta boy; Mini/masaüstü; Diğer